Georgia, session 2025_26, HB232.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
8 SECTION 1.
9 Chapter 24A of Title 43 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to massage
10 therapy practice, is amended by revising paragraph (6) of Code Section 43-24A-3, relating
11 to definitions, as follows:
12 "(6) 'License' means a valid and current certificate of registration issued by the board
13 pursuant to this chapter to practice massage therapy or a multistate license issued
14 pursuant to the Interstate Massage Compact contained in Article 3 of this chapter."
- 1 -

25 LC 55 0611S
15 SECTION 2.
16 Said chapter is further amended by revising subsection (b) of Code Section 43-24A-7,
17 relating to the powers of the Georgia Board of Massage Therapy, as follows:
18 "(b) The board shall have the power to:
19 (1) Examine and determine the qualifications and fitness of applicants for licenses to
20 practice massage therapy in this state;
21 (2) Issue, renew, refuse to renew, deny, suspend, or revoke licenses to practice massage
22 therapy in this state or otherwise discipline licensed massage therapists;
23 (3) Conduct investigations for the purpose of discovering violations of this chapter or
24 grounds for disciplining persons or entities acting in violation of this chapter;
25 (4) Initiate on-site inspections of the facility, equipment, policies, and practices of a
26 massage therapy business or board recognized massage therapy educational program by
27 appropriate inspectors in the office of the Secretary of State for the purpose of
28 determining compliance with the standards established pursuant to this chapter;
29 (5) Hold hearings on all matters properly brought before the board and, in conjunction
30 therewith, to administer oaths, receive evidence, make the necessary determinations, and
31 enter orders consistent with the findings. The board may designate one or more of its
32 members as its hearing officer;
33 (6) Adopt, revise, and enforce rules concerning advertising by licensees including, but
34 not limited to, rules to prohibit false, misleading, or deceptive practices;
35 (7) Periodically evaluate board recognized massage therapy educational programs and
36 license such programs that meet the board's requirements;
37 (8) Develop and enforce standards for continuing education courses required of licensed
38 massage therapists which may include courses in massage therapy or any of the
39 modalities described in paragraphs (5) through (8) of subsection (a) of Code Section
40 43-24A-19;
- 2 -

25 LC 55 0611S
41 (9) Develop and enforce reasonable and uniform standards for massage therapy
42 educational programs and massage therapy practice;
43 (10) Deny or withdraw recognition of noncompliant massage therapy educational
44 programs that do not meet standards established pursuant to this chapter;
45 (11) Appoint standing or ad hoc committees as necessary to inform and make
46 recommendations to the board about issues and concerns of the massage therapy
47 profession and to facilitate communication amongst the board, licensees under this
48 chapter, and the community, which may include nonmembers of the board;
49 (12) Collect and publish data regarding existing massage therapy resources in Georgia
50 without violation of any state or federal privacy laws and coordinate planning for board
51 recognized massage therapy educational programs and practice;
52 (13) Adopt an official seal; and
53 (14) Bring proceedings to the courts for the enforcement of this chapter or any rules and
54 regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter; and
55 (15) Administer the Interstate Massage Compact contained in Article 3 of this chapter."
56 SECTION 3.
57 Said chapter is further amended by revising paragraph (6) of subsection (b) of Code
58 Section 43-24A-8, relating to licensure of massage therapists, application, and requirements,
59 as follows:
60 "(6) The applicant has completed successfully a board recognized massage therapy
61 educational program consisting of a minimum of 500 625 hours of course and clinical
62 work;"
63 SECTION 4.
64 Said chapter is further amended by adding a new article to read as follows:
- 3 -

25 LC 55 0611S
65 "ARTICLE 3
66 43-24A-40.
67 This article shall be known and may be cited as the 'Interstate Massage Compact Act.'
68 43-24A-41.
69 The Interstate Massage Compact is enacted into law and entered into by the State of
70 Georgia with any and all other states legally joining therein in the form substantially as
71 follows:
72 'INTERSTATE MASSAGE COMPACT
73 ARTICLE 1- PURPOSE
74 The purpose of this Compact is to reduce the burdens on State governments and to facilitate
75 the interstate practice and regulation of Massage Therapy with the goal of improving public
76 access to, and the safety of, Massage Therapy Services. Through this Compact, the
77 Member States seek to establish a regulatory framework which provides for a new
78 multistate licensing program. Through this additional licensing pathway, the Member
79 States seek to provide increased value and mobility to licensed massage therapists in the
80 Member States, while ensuring the provision of safe, competent, and reliable services to
81 the public.
82 This Compact is designed to achieve the following objectives, and the Member States
83 hereby ratify the same intentions by subscribing hereto:
84 A. Increase public access to Massage Therapy Services by providing for a multistate
85 licensing pathway;
86 B. Enhance the Member States' ability to protect the public's health and safety;
87 C. Enhance the Member States' ability to prevent human trafficking and licensure fraud;
- 4 -

25 LC 55 0611S
88 D. Encourage the cooperation of Member States in regulating the multistate Practice of
89 Massage Therapy;
90 E. Support relocating military members and their spouses;
91 F. Facilitate and enhance the exchange of licensure, investigative, and disciplinary
92 information between the Member States;
93 G. Create an Interstate Commission that will exist to implement and administer the
94 Compact;
95 H. Allow a Member State to hold a Licensee accountable, even where that Licensee holds
96 a Multistate License;
97 I. Create a streamlined pathway for Licensees to practice in Member States, thus
98 increasing the mobility of duly licensed massage therapists; and
99 J. Serve the needs of licensed massage therapists and the public receiving their services;
100 however,
101 K. Nothing in this Compact is intended to prevent a State from enforcing its own laws
102 regarding the Practice of Massage Therapy.
103 ARTICLE 2- DEFINITIONS
104 As used in this Compact, except as otherwise provided and subject to clarification by the
105 Rules of the Commission, the following definitions shall govern the terms herein:
106 A. "Active Duty Military" - any individual in full-time duty status in the active uniformed
107 service of the United States including members of the National Guard and Reserve.
108 B. "Adverse Action" - any administrative, civil, equitable, or criminal action permitted by
109 a Member State's laws which is imposed by a Licensing Authority or other regulatory body
110 against a Licensee, including actions against an individual's Authorization to Practice such
111 as revocation, suspension, probation, surrender in lieu of discipline, monitoring of the
112 Licensee, limitation of the Licensee's practice, or any other Encumbrance on licensure
- 5 -

25 LC 55 0611S
113 affecting an individual's ability to practice Massage Therapy, including the issuance of a
114 cease and desist order.
115 C. "Alternative Program" - a non-disciplinary monitoring or prosecutorial diversion
116 program approved by a Member State's Licensing Authority.
117 D. "Authorization to Practice" - a legal authorization by a Remote State pursuant to a
118 Multistate License permitting the Practice of Massage Therapy in that Remote State, which
119 shall be subject to the enforcement jurisdiction of the Licensing Authority in that Remote
120 State.
121 E. "Background Check" - the submission of an applicant's criminal history record
122 information, as further defined in 28 C.F.R. § 20.3(d), as amended from the Federal Bureau
123 of Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining State criminal records in the
124 applicant's Home State.
125 F. "Charter Member States" - Member States who have enacted legislation to adopt this
126 Compact where such legislation predates the effective date of this Compact as defined in
127 Article 12.
128 G. "Commission" - the government agency whose membership consists of all States that
129 have enacted this Compact, which is known as the Interstate Massage Compact
130 Commission, as defined in Article 8, and which shall operate as an instrumentality of the
131 Member States.
132 H. "Continuing Competence" - a requirement, as a condition of license renewal, to provide
133 evidence of participation in, and completion of, educational or professional activities that
134 maintain, improve, or enhance Massage Therapy fitness to practice.
135 I. "Current Significant Investigative Information" - Investigative Information that a
136 Licensing Authority, after an inquiry or investigation that complies with a Member State's
137 due process requirements, has reason to believe is not groundless and, if proved true, would
138 indicate a violation of that State's laws regarding the Practice of Massage Therapy.
- 6 -

25 LC 55 0611S
139 J. "Data System" - a repository of information about Licensees who hold Multistate
140 Licenses, which may include but is not limited to license status, Investigative Information,
141 and Adverse Actions.
142 K. "Disqualifying Event" - any event which shall disqualify an individual from holding
143 a Multistate License under this Compact, which the Commission may by Rule specify.
144 L. "Encumbrance" - a revocation or suspension of, or any limitation or condition on, the
145 full and unrestricted Practice of Massage Therapy by a Licensing Authority.
146 M. "Executive Committee" - a group of delegates elected or appointed to act on behalf of,
147 and within the powers granted to them by, the Commission.
148 N. "Home State" - means the Member State which is a Licensee's primary state of
149 residence where the Licensee holds an active Single-State License.
150 O. "Investigative Information" - information, records, or documents received or generated
151 by a Licensing Authority pursuant to an investigation or other inquiry.
152 P. "Licensing Authority" - a State's regulatory body responsible for issuing Massage
153 Therapy licenses or otherwise overseeing the Practice of Massage Therapy in that State.
154 Q. "Licensee" - an individual who currently holds a license from a Member State to fully
155 practice Massage Therapy, whose license is not a student, provisional, temporary, inactive,
156 or other similar status.
157 R. "Massage Therapy", "Massage Therapy Services", and the "Practice of Massage
158 Therapy" - the care and services provided by a Licensee as set forth in the Member State's
159 statutes and regulations in the State where the services are being provided.
160 S. "Member State" - any State that has adopted this Compact.
161 T. "Multistate License" - a license that consists of Authorizations to Practice Massage
162 Therapy in all Remote States pursuant to this Compact, which shall be subject to the
163 enforcement jurisdiction of the Licensing Authority in a Licensee's Home State.
164 U. "National Licensing Examination" - A national examination developed by a national
165 association of Massage Therapy regulatory boards, as defined by Commission Rule, that
- 7 -

25 LC 55 0611S
166 is derived from a practice analysis and is consistent with generally accepted psychometric
167 principles of fairness, validity and reliability, and is administered under secure and
168 confidential examination protocols.
169 V. "Remote State" - any Member State, other than the Licensee's Home State.
170 W. "Rule" - any opinion or regulation promulgated by the Commission under this
171 Compact, which shall have the force of law.
172 X. "Single-State License" - a current, valid authorization issued by a Member State's
173 Licensing Authority allowing an individual to fully practice Massage Therapy, that is not
174 a restricted, student, provisional, temporary, or inactive practice authorization and
175 authorizes practice only within the issuing State.
176 Y. "State" - a state, territory, possession of the United States, or the District of Columbia.
177 ARTICLE 3- MEMBER STATE REQUIREMENTS
178 A. To be eligible to join this Compact, and to maintain eligibility as a Member State, a
179 State must:
180 1. License and regulate the Practice of Massage Therapy;
181 2. Have a mechanism or entity in place to receive and investigate complaints from the
182 public, regulatory or law enforcement agencies, or the Commission about Licensees
183 practicing in that State;
184 3. Accept passage of a National Licensing Examination as a criterion for Massage
185 Therapy licensure in that State;
186 4. Require that Licensees satisfy educational requirements prior to being licensed to
187 provide Massage Therapy Services to the public in that State;
188 5. Implement procedures for requiring the Background Check of applicants for a
189 Multistate License, and for the reporting of any Disqualifying Events, including but not
190 limited to obtaining and submitting, for each Licensee holding a Multistate License and
191 each applicant for a Multistate License, fingerprint or other biometric-based information
- 8 -

25 LC 55 0611S
192 to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for Background Checks; receiving the results of
193 the Federal Bureau of Investigation record search on Background Checks and considering
194 the results of such a Background Check in making licensure decisions;
195 6. Have Continuing Competence requirements as a condition for license renewal;
196 7. Participate in the Data System, including through the use of unique identifying
197 numbers as described herein;
198 8. Notify the Commission and other Member States, in compliance with the terms of the
199 Compact and Rules of the Commission, of any disciplinary action taken by the State
200 against a Licensee practicing under a Multistate License in that State, or of the existence
201 of Investigative Information or Current Significant Investigative Information regarding
202 a Licensee practicing in that State pursuant to a Multistate License;
203 9. Comply with the Rules of the Commission;
204 10. Accept Licensees with valid Multistate Licenses from other Member States as
205 established herein;
206 B. Individuals not residing in a Member State shall continue to be able to apply for a
207 Member State's Single-State License as provided under the laws of each Member State.
208 However, the Single-State License granted to those individuals shall not be recognized as
209 granting a Multistate License for Massage Therapy in any other Member State;
210 C. Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements established by a Member State
211 for the issuance of a Single-State License; and
212 D. A Multistate License issued to a Licensee shall be recognized by each Remote State as
213 an Authorization to Practice Massage Therapy in each Remote State.
214 ARTICLE 4- MULTISTATE LICENSE REQUIREMENTS
215 A. To qualify for a Multistate License under this Compact, and to maintain eligibility for
216 such a license, an applicant must:
- 9 -

25 LC 55 0611S
217 1. Hold an active Single-State License to practice Massage Therapy in the applicant's
218 Home State;
219 2. Have completed at least six hundred and twenty-five (625) clock hours of Massage
220 Therapy education or the substantial equivalent which the Commission may approve by
221 Rule.
222 3. Have passed a National Licensing Examination or the substantial equivalent which the
223 Commission may approve by Rule.
224 4. Submit to a Background Check;
225 5. Have not been convicted or found guilty, or have entered into an agreed disposition,
226 of a felony offense under applicable State or federal criminal law, within five (5) years
227 prior to the date of their application, where such a time period shall not include any time
228 served for the offense, and provided that the applicant has completed any and all
229 requirements arising as a result of any such offense;
230 6. Have not been convicted or found guilty, or have entered into an agreed disposition,
231 of a misdemeanor offense related to the Practice of Massage Therapy under applicable
232 State or federal criminal law, within two (2) years prior to the date of their application
233 where such a time period shall not include any time served for the offense, and provided
234 that the applicant has completed any and all requirements arising as a result of any such
235 offense;
236 7. Have not been convicted or found guilty, or have entered into an agreed disposition,
237 of any offense, whether a misdemeanor or a felony, under State or federal law, at any
238 time, relating to any of the following:
239 a. Kidnapping;
240 b. Human trafficking;
241 c. Human smuggling;
242 d. Sexual battery, sexual assault, or any related offenses; or
243 e. Any other category of offense which the Commission may by Rule designate.
- 10 -

25 LC 55 0611S
244 8. Have not previously held a Massage Therapy license which was revoked by, or
245 surrendered in lieu of discipline to an applicable Licensing Authority;
246 9. Have no history of any Adverse Action on any occupational or professional license
247 within two (2) years prior to the date of their application; and
248 10. Pay all required fees.
249 B. A Multistate License granted pursuant to this Compact may be effective for a definite
250 period of time concurrent with the renewal of the Home State license.
251 C. A Licensee practicing in a Member State is subject to all scope of practice laws
252 governing Massage Therapy Services in that State.
253 D. The Practice of Massage Therapy under a Multistate License granted pursuant to this
254 Compact will subject the Licensee to the jurisdiction of the Licensing Authority, the courts,
255 and the laws of the Member State in which the Massage Therapy Services are provided.
256 ARTICLE 5- AUTHORITY OF INTERSTATE MASSAGE COMPACT COMMISSION
257 AND MEMBER STATE LICENSING AUTHORITIES
258 A. Nothing in this Compact, nor any Rule of the Commission, shall be construed to limit,
259 restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a Member State to enact and enforce laws,
260 regulations, or other rules related to the Practice of Massage Therapy in that State, where
261 those laws, regulations, or other rules are not inconsistent with the provisions of this
262 Compact.
263 B. Nothing in this Compact, nor any Rule of the Commission, shall be construed to limit,
264 restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a Member State to take Adverse Action against
265 a Licensee's Single-State License to practice Massage Therapy in that State.
266 C. Nothing in this Compact, nor any Rule of the Commission, shall be construed to limit,
267 restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a Remote State to take Adverse Action against
268 a Licensee's Authorization to Practice in that State.
- 11 -

25 LC 55 0611S
269 D. Nothing in this Compact, nor any Rule of the Commission, shall be construed to limit,
270 restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a Licensee's Home State to take Adverse Action
271 against a Licensee's Multistate License based upon information provided by a Remote
272 State.
273 E. Insofar as practical, a Member State's Licensing Authority shall cooperate with the
274 Commission and with each entity exercising independent regulatory authority over the
275 Practice of Massage Therapy according to the provisions of this Compact.
276 ARTICLE 6- ADVERSE ACTIONS
277 A. A Licensee's Home State shall have exclusive power to impose an Adverse Action
278 against a Licensee's Multistate License issued by the Home State.
279 B. A Home State may take Adverse Action on a Multistate License based on the
280 Investigative Information, Current Significant Investigative Information, or Adverse Action
281 of a Remote State.
282 C. A Home State shall retain authority to complete any pending investigations of a
283 Licensee practicing under a Multistate License who changes their Home State during the
284 course of such an investigation. The Licensing Authority shall also be empowered to
285 report the results of such an investigation to the Commission through the Data System as
286 described herein.
287 D. Any Member State may investigate actual or alleged violations of the scope of practice
288 laws in any other Member State for a massage therapist who holds a Multistate License.
289 E. A Remote State shall have the authority to:
290 1. Take Adverse Actions against a Licensee's Authorization to Practice;
291 2. Issue cease and desist orders or impose an Encumbrance on a Licensee's Authorization
292 to Practice in that State.
293 3. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require the attendance and
294 testimony of witnesses, as well as the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a
- 12 -

25 LC 55 0611S
295 Licensing Authority in a Member State for the attendance and testimony of witnesses or
296 the production of evidence from another Member State shall be enforced in the latter
297 State by any court of competent jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure of
298 that court applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings before it. The issuing Licensing
299 Authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage, and other fees required
300 by the service statutes of the State in which the witnesses or evidence are located.
301 4. If otherwise permitted by State law, recover from the affected Licensee the costs of
302 investigations and disposition of cases resulting from any Adverse Action taken against
303 that Licensee.
304 5. Take Adverse Action against the Licensee's Authorization to Practice in that State
305 based on the factual findings of another Member State.
306 F. If an Adverse Action is taken by the Home State against a Licensee's Multistate License
307 or Single-State License to practice in the Home State, the Licensee's Authorization to
308 Practice in all other Member States shall be deactivated until all Encumbrances have been
309 removed from such license. All Home State disciplinary orders that impose an Adverse
310 Action against a Licensee shall include a statement that the Massage Therapist's
311 Authorization to Practice is deactivated in all Member States during the pendency of the
312 order.
313 G. If Adverse Action is taken by a Remote State against a Licensee's Authorization to
314 Practice, that Adverse Action applies to all Authorizations to Practice in all Remote States.
315 A Licensee whose Authorization to Practice in a Remote State is removed for a specified
316 period of time is not eligible to apply for a new Multistate License in any other State until
317 the specific time for removal of the Authorization to Practice has passed and all
318 encumbrance requirements are satisfied.
319 H. Nothing in this Compact shall override a Member State's authority to accept a
320 Licensee's participation in an Alternative Program in lieu of Adverse Action. A Licensee's
- 13 -

25 LC 55 0611S
321 Multistate License shall be suspended for the duration of the Licensee's participation in any
322 Alternative Program.
323 I. Joint Investigations
324 1. In addition to the authority granted to a Member State by its respective scope of
325 practice laws or other applicable State law, a Member State may participate with other
326 Member States in joint investigations of Licensees.
327 2. Member States shall share any investigative, litigation, or compliance materials in
328 furtherance of any joint or individual investigation initiated under the Compact.
329 ARTICLE 7- ACTIVE DUTY MILITARY AND THEIR SPOUSES
330 Active Duty Military personnel, or their spouses, shall designate a Home State where the
331 individual has a current license to practice Massage Therapy in good standing. The
332 individual may retain their Home State designation during any period of service when that
333 individual or their spouse is on active duty assignment.
334 ARTICLE 8- ESTABLISHMENT AND OPERATION OF
335 INTERSTATE MASSAGE COMPACT COMMISSION
336 A. The Compact Member States hereby create and establish a joint government agency
337 whose membership consists of all Member States that have enacted the Compact known
338 as the Interstate Massage Compact Commission. The Commission is an instrumentality
339 of the Compact States acting jointly and not an instrumentality of any one State. The
340 Commission shall come into existence on or after the effective date of the Compact as set
341 forth in Article 12.
342 B. Membership, Voting, and Meetings
343 1. Each Member State shall have and be limited to one (1) delegate selected by that
344 Member State's State Licensing Authority.
- 14 -

25 LC 55 0611S
345 2. The delegate shall be the primary administrative officer of the State Licensing
346 Authority or their designee.
347 3. The Commission shall by Rule or bylaw establish a term of office for delegates and
348 may by Rule or bylaw establish term limits.
349 4. The Commission may recommend removal or suspension of any delegate from office.
350 5. A Member State's State Licensing Authority shall fill any vacancy of its delegate
351 occurring on the Commission within 60 days of the vacancy.
352 6. Each delegate shall be entitled to one vote on all matters that are voted on by the
353 Commission.
354 7. The Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year. Additional
355 meetings may be held as set forth in the bylaws. The Commission may meet by
356 telecommunication, video conference or other similar electronic means.
357 C. The Commission shall have the following powers:
358 1. Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;
359 2. Establish code of conduct and conflict of interest policies;
360 3. Adopt Rules and bylaws;
361 4. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
362 5. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this Compact, the
363 Commission's Rules, and the bylaws;
364 6. Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the name of the Commission,
365 provided that the standing of any State Licensing Authority to sue or be sued under
366 applicable law shall not be affected;
367 7. Maintain and certify records and information provided to a Member State as the
368 authenticated business records of the Commission, and designate an agent to do so on the
369 Commission's behalf;
370 8. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
- 15 -

25 LC 55 0611S
371 9. Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including, but not limited to,
372 employees of a Member State;
373 10. Conduct an annual financial review;
374 11. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties, grant such
375 individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the Compact, and establish
376 the Commission's personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest,
377 qualifications of personnel, and other related personnel matters;
378 12. Assess and collect fees;
379 13. Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants of money, other sources of
380 revenue, equipment, supplies, materials, and services, and receive, utilize, and dispose
381 of the same; provided that at all times the Commission shall avoid any appearance of
382 impropriety or conflict of interest;
383 14. Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any property, real, personal, or
384 mixed, or any undivided interest therein;
385 15. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise dispose of
386 any property real, personal, or mixed;
387 16. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
388 17. Borrow money;
389 18. Appoint committees, including standing committees, composed of members, State
390 regulators, State legislators or their representatives, and consumer representatives, and
391 such other interested persons as may be designated in this Compact and the bylaws;
392 19. Accept and transmit complaints from the public, regulatory or law enforcement
393 agencies, or the Commission, to the relevant Member State(s) regarding potential
394 misconduct of Licensees;
395 20. Elect a Chair, Vice Chair, Secretary and Treasurer and such other officers of the
396 Commission as provided in the Commission's bylaws;
397 21. Establish and elect an Executive Committee, including a chair and a vice chair;
- 16 -

25 LC 55 0611S
398 22. Adopt and provide to the Member States an annual report.
399 23. Determine whether a State's adopted language is materially different from the model
400 Compact language such that the State would not qualify for participation in the Compact;
401 and
402 24. Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the
403 purposes of this Compact.
404 D. The Executive Committee
405 1. The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the Commission
406 according to the terms of this Compact. The powers, duties, and responsibilities of the
407 Executive Committee shall include:
408 a. Overseeing the day-to-day activities of the administration of the Compact including
409 compliance with the provisions of the Compact, the Commission's Rules and bylaws,
410 and other such duties as deemed necessary;
411 b. Recommending to the Commission changes to the Rules or bylaws, changes to this
412 Compact legislation, fees charged to Compact Member States, fees charged to
413 Licensees, and other fees;
414 c. Ensuring Compact administration services are appropriately provided, including by
415 contract;
416 d. Preparing and recommending the budget;
417 e. Maintaining financial records on behalf of the Commission;
418 f. Monitoring Compact compliance of Member States and providing compliance
419 reports to the Commission;
420 g. Establishing additional committees as necessary;
421 h. Exercise the powers and duties of the Commission during the interim between
422 Commission meetings, except for adopting or amending Rules, adopting or amending
423 bylaws, and exercising any other powers and duties expressly reserved to the
424 Commission by Rule or bylaw; and
- 17 -

25 LC 55 0611S
425 i. Other duties as provided in the Rules or bylaws of the Commission.
426 2. The Executive Committee shall be composed of seven voting members and up to two
427 exofficio members as follows:
428 a. The chair and vice chair of the Commission and any other members of the
429 Commission who serve on the Executive Committee shall be voting members of the
430 Executive Committee; and
431 b. Other than the chair, vice-chair, secretary and treasurer, the Commission shall elect
432 three voting members from the current membership of the Commission.
433 c. The Commission may elect ex-officio, nonvoting members as necessary as follows:
434 i. One ex-officio member who is a representative of the national association of State
435 Massage Therapy regulatory boards
436 ii. One ex-officio member as specified in the Commission's bylaws.
437 3. The Commission may remove any member of the Executive Committee as provided
438 in the Commission's bylaws.
439 4. The Executive Committee shall meet at least annually.
440 a. Executive Committee meetings shall be open to the public, except that the Executive
441 Committee may meet in a closed, non-public session of a public meeting when dealing
442 with any of the matters covered under subsection F.4.
443 b. The Executive Committee shall give five business days advance notice of its public
444 meetings, posted on its website and as determined to provide notice to persons with an
445 interest in the public matters the Executive Committee intends to address at those
446 meetings.
447 5. The Executive Committee may hold an emergency meeting when acting for the
448 Commission to:
449 a. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
450 b. Prevent a loss of Commission or Participating State funds; or
451 c. Protect public health and safety.
- 18 -

25 LC 55 0611S
452 E. The Commission shall adopt and provide to the Member States an annual report.
453 F. Meetings of the Commission
454 1. All meetings of the Commission that are not closed pursuant to this subsection shall
455 be open to the public. Notice of public meetings shall be posted on the Commission's
456 website at least thirty (30) days prior to the public meeting.
457 2. Notwithstanding subsection F.1 of this Article, the Commission may convene an
458 emergency public meeting by providing at least twenty-four (24) hours prior notice on
459 the Commission's website, and any other means as provided in the Commission's Rules,
460 for any of the reasons it may dispense with notice of proposed rulemaking under Article
461 10.L. The Commission's legal counsel shall certify the that one of the reasons justifying
462 an emergency public meeting has been met.
463 3. Notice of all Commission meetings shall provide the time, date, and location of the
464 meeting, and if the meeting is to be held or accessible via telecommunication, video
465 conference, or other electronic means, the notice shall include the mechanism for access
466 to the meeting.
467 4. The Commission may convene in a closed, non-public meeting for the Commission
468 to discuss:
469 a. Non-compliance of a Member State with its obligations under the Compact;
470 b. The employment, compensation, discipline or other matters, practices or procedures
471 related to specific employees or other matters related to the Commission's internal
472 personnel practices and procedures;
473 c. Current or threatened discipline of a Licensee by the Commission or by a Member
474 State's Licensing Authority;
475 d. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation;
476 e. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of goods, services, or real
477 estate;
478 f. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
- 19 -

25 LC 55 0611S
479 g. Trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged or
480 confidential;
481 h. Information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly
482 unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
483 i. Investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
484 j. Information related to any investigative reports prepared by or on behalf of or for use
485 of the Commission or other committee charged with responsibility of investigation or
486 determination of compliance issues pursuant to the Compact;
487 k. Legal advice;
488 l. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure to the public by federal or Member
489 State law; or
490 m. Other matters as promulgated by the Commission by Rule.
491 5. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the presiding officer shall state that the
492 meeting will be closed and reference each relevant exempting provision, and such
493 reference shall be recorded in the minutes.
494 6. The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe all matters
495 discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken,
496 and the reasons therefore, including a description of the views expressed. All documents
497 considered in connection with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes
498 and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release only by a
499 majority vote of the Commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
500 G. Financing of the Commission
501 1. The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable expenses of
502 its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.
503 2. The Commission may accept any and all appropriate sources of revenue, donations,
504 and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services.
- 20 -

25 LC 55 0611S
505 3. The Commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each Member
506 State and impose fees on Licensees of Member States to whom it grants a Multistate
507 License to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the Commission and its staff,
508 which must be in a total amount sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved each
509 year for which revenue is not provided by other sources. The aggregate annual
510 assessment amount for Member States shall be allocated based upon a formula that the
511 Commission shall promulgate by Rule.
512 4. The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the funds
513 adequate to meet the same; nor shall the Commission pledge the credit of any Member
514 States, except by and with the authority of the Member State.
515 5. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The
516 receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall be subject to the financial review and
517 accounting procedures established under its bylaws. All receipts and disbursements of
518 funds handled by the Commission shall be subject to an annual financial review by a
519 certified or licensed public accountant, and the report of the financial review shall be
520 included in and become part of the annual report of the Commission.
521 H. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification
522 1. The members, officers, executive director, employees and representatives of the
523 Commission shall be immune from suit and liability, both personally and in their official
524 capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil
525 liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that
526 occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for
527 believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties or
528 responsibilities; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to protect any
529 such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the
530 intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person. The procurement of insurance
- 21 -

25 LC 55 0611S
531 of any type by the Commission shall not in any way compromise or limit the immunity
532 granted hereunder.
533 2. The Commission shall defend any member, officer, executive director, employee, and
534 representative of the Commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising
535 out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of
536 Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or as determined by the Commission
537 that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing
538 occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities;
539 provided that nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining their
540 own counsel at their own expense; and provided further, that the actual or alleged act,
541 error, or omission did not result from that person's intentional or willful or wanton
542 misconduct.
543 3. The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member, officer, executive
544 director, employee, and representative of the Commission for the amount of any
545 settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged
546 act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties,
547 or responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred
548 within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that
549 the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from the intentional or willful
550 or wanton misconduct of that person.
551 4. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the liability of any Licensee for
552 professional malpractice or misconduct, which shall be governed solely by any other
553 applicable State laws.
554 5. Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted to waive or otherwise abrogate a Member
555 State's State action immunity or State action affirmative defense with respect to antitrust
556 claims under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any other State or federal antitrust or
557 anticompetitive law or regulation.
- 22 -

25 LC 55 0611S
558 6. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity by
559 the Member States or by the Commission.
560 ARTICLE 9- DATA SYSTEM
561 A. The Commission shall provide for the development, maintenance, operation, and
562 utilization of a coordinated database and reporting system.
563 B. The Commission shall assign each applicant for a Multistate License a unique
564 identifier, as determined by the Rules of the Commission.
565 C. Notwithstanding any other provision of State law to the contrary, a Member State shall
566 submit a uniform data set to the Data System on all individuals to whom this Compact is
567 applicable as required by the Rules of the Commission, including:
568 1. Identifying information;
569 2. Licensure data;
570 3. Adverse Actions against a license and information related thereto;
571 4. Non-confidential information related to Alternative Program participation, the
572 beginning and ending dates of such participation, and other information related to such
573 participation;
574 5. Any denial of application for licensure, and the reason(s) for such denial (excluding
575 the reporting of any criminal history record information where prohibited by law);
576 6. The existence of Investigative Information;
577 7. The existence presence of Current Significant Investigative Information; and
578 8. Other information that may facilitate the administration of this Compact or the
579 protection of the public, as determined by the Rules of the Commission.
580 D. The records and information provided to a Member State pursuant to this Compact or
581 through the Data System, when certified by the Commission or an agent thereof, shall
582 constitute the authenticated business records of the Commission, and shall be entitled to
- 23 -

25 LC 55 0611S
583 any associated hearsay exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-judicial or administrative
584 proceedings in a Member State.
585 E. The existence of Current Significant Investigative Information and the existence of
586 Investigative Information pertaining to a Licensee in any Member State will only be
587 available to other Member States.
588 F. It is the responsibility of the Member States to report any Adverse Action against a
589 Licensee who holds a Multistate License and to monitor the database to determine whether
590 Adverse Action has been taken against such a Licensee or License applicant. Adverse
591 Action information pertaining to a Licensee or License applicant in any Member State will
592 be available to any other Member State.
593 G. Member States contributing information to the Data System may designate information
594 that may not be shared with the public without the express permission of the contributing
595 State.
596 H. Any information submitted to the Data System that is subsequently expunged pursuant
597 to federal law or the laws of the Member State contributing the information shall be
598 removed from the Data System.
599 ARTICLE 10- RULEMAKING
600 A. The Commission shall promulgate reasonable Rules in order to effectively and
601 efficiently implement and administer the purposes and provisions of the Compact. A Rule
602 shall be invalid and have no force or effect only if a court of competent jurisdiction holds
603 that the Rule is invalid because the Commission exercised its rulemaking authority in a
604 manner that is beyond the scope and purposes of the Compact, or the powers granted
605 hereunder, or based upon another applicable standard of review.
606 B. The Rules of the Commission shall have the force of law in each Member State,
607 provided however that where the Rules of the Commission conflict with the laws of the
608 Member State that establish the Member State's scope of practice as held by a court of
- 24 -

25 LC 55 0611S
609 competent jurisdiction, the Rules of the Commission shall be ineffective in that State to the
610 extent of the conflict.
611 C. The Commission shall exercise its Rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria set forth
612 in this article and the Rules adopted thereunder. Rules shall become binding as of the date
613 specified by the Commission for each Rule.
614 D. If a majority of the legislatures of the Member States rejects a Rule or portion of a Rule,
615 by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the Compact
616 within four (4) years of the date of adoption of the Rule, then such Rule shall have no
617 further force and effect in any Member State or to any State applying to participate in the
618 Compact.
619 E. Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the Commission.
620 F. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule, the Commission shall hold a public hearing and
621 allow persons to provide oral and written comments, data, facts, opinions, and arguments.
622 G. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule by the Commission, and at least thirty (30) days
623 in advance of the meeting at which the Commission will hold a public hearing on the
624 proposed Rule, the Commission shall provide a Notice of Proposed Rulemaking:
625 1. On the website of the Commission or other publicly accessible platform;
626 2. To persons who have requested notice of the Commission's notices of proposed
627 rulemaking, and
628 3. In such other way(s) as the Commission may by Rule specify.
629 H. The Notice of Proposed Rulemaking shall include:
630 1. The time, date, and location of the public hearing at which the Commission will hear
631 public comments on the proposed Rule and, if different, the time, date, and location of
632 the meeting where the Commission will consider and vote on the proposed Rule;
633 2. If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video conference, or other electronic
634 means, the Commission shall include the mechanism for access to the hearing in the
635 Notice of Proposed Rulemaking;
- 25 -

25 LC 55 0611S
636 3. The text of the proposed Rule and the reason therefor;
637 4. A request for comments on the proposed Rule from any interested person; and
638 5. The manner in which interested persons may submit written comments.
639 I. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and all written comments and
640 documents received by the Commission in response to the proposed Rule shall be available
641 to the public.
642 J. Nothing in this article shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each Rule.
643 Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the Commission at hearings required by this
644 article.
645 K. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all Commissioners, take final action on the
646 proposed Rule based on the Rulemaking record.
647 1. The Commission may adopt changes to the proposed Rule provided the changes do
648 not enlarge the original purpose of the proposed Rule.
649 2. The Commission shall provide an explanation of the reasons for substantive changes
650 made to the proposed Rule as well as reasons for substantive changes not made that were
651 recommended by commenters.
652 3. The Commission shall determine a reasonable effective date for the Rule. Except for
653 an emergency as provided in subsection L of this article, the effective date of the Rule
654 shall be no sooner than thirty (30) days after the Commission issuing the notice that it
655 adopted or amended the Rule.
656 L. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Commission may consider and adopt
657 an emergency Rule with 24 hours notice, provided that the usual Rulemaking procedures
658 provided in the Compact and in this article shall be retroactively applied to the Rule as
659 soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety (90) days after the effective date
660 of the Rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emergency Rule is one that must be
661 adopted immediately to:
662 1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
- 26 -

25 LC 55 0611S
663 2. Prevent a loss of Commission or Member State funds;
664 3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a Rule that is established by federal law or
665 rule; or
666 4. Protect public health and safety.
667 M. The Commission or an authorized committee of the Commission may direct revisions
668 to a previously adopted Rule for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in
669 format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall
670 be posted on the website of the Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by
671 any person for a period of thirty (30) days after posting. The revision may be challenged
672 only on grounds that the revision results in a material change to a Rule. A challenge shall
673 be made in writing and delivered to the Commission prior to the end of the notice period.
674 If no challenge is made, the revision will take effect without further action. If the revision
675 is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the approval of the Commission.
676 N. No Member State's rulemaking requirements shall apply under this Compact.
677 ARTICLE 11- OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT
678 A. Oversight
679 1. The executive and judicial branches of State government in each Member State shall
680 enforce this Compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate to implement the
681 Compact.
682 2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the Commission shall be
683 brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal
684 office of the Commission is located. The Commission may waive venue and
685 jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative
686 dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing herein shall affect or limit the selection or
687 propriety of venue in any action against a Licensee for professional malpractice,
688 misconduct or any such similar matter.
- 27 -

25 LC 55 0611S
689 3. The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any proceeding
690 regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the Compact and shall have standing to
691 intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide the Commission
692 service of process shall render a judgment or order void as to the Commission, this
693 Compact, or promulgated Rules.
694 B. Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination
695 1. If the Commission determines that a Member State has defaulted in the performance
696 of its obligations or responsibilities under this Compact or the promulgated Rules, the
697 Commission shall provide written notice to the defaulting State. The notice of default
698 shall describe the default, the proposed means of curing the default, and any other action
699 that the Commission may take, and shall offer training and specific technical assistance
700 regarding the default.
701 2. The Commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default to the other Member
702 States.
703 C. If a State in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting State may be terminated from
704 the Compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the delegates of the Member States,
705 and all rights, privileges and benefits conferred on that State by this Compact may be
706 terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the
707 offending State of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default.
708 D. Termination of membership in the Compact shall be imposed only after all other means
709 of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall
710 be given by the Commission to the governor, the majority and minority leaders of the
711 defaulting State's legislature, the defaulting State's State Licensing Authority and each of
712 the Member States' State Licensing Authority.
713 E. A State that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations, and
714 liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including obligations that
715 extend beyond the effective date of termination.
- 28 -

25 LC 55 0611S
716 F. Upon the termination of a State's membership from this Compact, that State shall
717 immediately provide notice to all Licensees who hold a Multistate License within that State
718 of such termination. The terminated State shall continue to recognize all licenses granted
719 pursuant to this Compact for a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days after the date
720 of said notice of termination.
721 G. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a State that is found to be in default
722 or that has been terminated from the Compact, unless agreed upon in writing between the
723 Commission and the defaulting State.
724 H. The defaulting State may appeal the action of the Commission by petitioning the U.S.
725 District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has
726 its principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation,
727 including reasonable attorney's fees.
728 I. Dispute Resolution
729 1. Upon request by a Member State, the Commission shall attempt to resolve disputes
730 related to the Compact that arise among Member States and between Member and
731 non-Member States.
732 2. The Commission shall promulgate a Rule providing for both mediation and binding
733 dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
734 J. Enforcement
735 1. The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the
736 provisions of this Compact and the Commission's Rules.
737 2. By majority vote as provided by Commission Rule, the Commission may initiate legal
738 action against a Member State in default in the United States District Court for the
739 District of Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its principal offices
740 to enforce compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its promulgated Rules.
741 The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial
742 enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such
- 29 -

25 LC 55 0611S
743 litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees. The remedies herein shall not be the
744 exclusive remedies of the Commission. The Commission may pursue any other remedies
745 available under federal or the defaulting Member State's law.
746 3. A Member State may initiate legal action against the Commission in the U.S. District
747 Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its
748 principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its
749 promulgated Rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages.
750 In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all
751 costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees.
752 4. No individual or entity other than a Member State may enforce this Compact against
753 the Commission.
754 ARTICLE 12- EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT
755 A. The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which the Compact statute is
756 enacted into law in the seventh Member State.
757 1. On or after the effective date of the Compact, the Commission shall convene and
758 review the enactment of each of the Charter Member States to determine if the statute
759 enacted by each such Charter Member State is materially different than the model
760 Compact statute.
761 a. A Charter Member State whose enactment is found to be materially different from
762 the model Compact statute shall be entitled to the default process set forth in Article 11.
763 b. If any Member State is later found to be in default, or is terminated or withdraws
764 from the Compact, the Commission shall remain in existence and the Compact shall
765 remain in effect even if the number of Member States should be less than seven (7).
766 2. Member States enacting the Compact subsequent to the Charter Member States shall
767 be subject to the process set forth in Article 8.C.23 to determine if their enactments are
- 30 -

25 LC 55 0611S
768 materially different from the model Compact statute and whether they qualify for
769 participation in the Compact.
770 3. All actions taken for the benefit of the Commission or in furtherance of the purposes
771 of the administration of the Compact prior to the effective date of the Compact or the
772 Commission coming into existence shall be considered to be actions of the Commission
773 unless specifically repudiated by the Commission.
774 4. Any State that joins the Compact shall be subject to the Commission's Rules and
775 bylaws as they exist on the date on which the Compact becomes law in that State. Any
776 Rule that has been previously adopted by the Commission shall have the full force and
777 effect of law on the day the Compact becomes law in that State.
778 B. Any Member State may withdraw from this Compact by enacting a statute repealing
779 that State's enactment of the Compact.
780 1. A Member State's withdrawal shall not take effect until one hundred eighty (180) days
781 after enactment of the repealing statute.
782 2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing State's
783 Licensing Authority to comply with the investigative and Adverse Action reporting
784 requirements of this Compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
785 3. Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this Compact, a State shall
786 immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all Licensees within that State.
787 Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory enactment to the contrary, such withdrawing
788 State shall continue to recognize all licenses granted pursuant to this Compact for a
789 minimum of 180 days after the date of such notice of withdrawal.
790 C. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any
791 licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a Member State and a
792 non-Member State that does not conflict with the provisions of this Compact.
- 31 -

25 LC 55 0611S
793 D. This Compact may be amended by the Member States. No amendment to this Compact
794 shall become effective and binding upon any Member State until it is enacted into the laws
795 of all Member States.
796 ARTICLE 13- CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
797 A. This Compact and the Commission's rulemaking authority shall be liberally construed
798 so as to effectuate the purposes, and the implementation and administration of the
799 Compact. Provisions of the Compact expressly authorizing or requiring the promulgation
800 of Rules shall not be construed to limit the Commission's rulemaking authority solely for
801 those purposes.
802 B. The provisions of this Compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence
803 or provision of this Compact is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be contrary to
804 the constitution of any Member State, a State seeking participation in the Compact, or of
805 the United States, or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or
806 circumstance is held to be unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, the validity
807 of the remainder of this Compact and the applicability thereof to any other government,
808 agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
809 C. Notwithstanding subsection B of this article, the Commission may deny a State's
810 participation in the Compact or, in accordance with the requirements of Article 11.B,
811 terminate a Member State's participation in the Compact, if it determines that a
812 constitutional requirement of a Member State is a material departure from the Compact.
813 Otherwise, if this Compact shall be held to be contrary to the constitution of any Member
814 State, the Compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining Member States
815 and in full force and effect as to the Member State affected as to all severable matters.
- 32 -

25 LC 55 0611S
816 ARTICLE 14- CONSISTENT EFFECT AND
817 CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE LAWS
818 Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any other law of a Member State
819 that is not inconsistent with the Compact.
820 Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a Member State in conflict
821 with the Compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.
822 All permissible agreements between the Commission and the Member States are binding
823 in accordance with their terms.'"
824 SECTION 5.
825 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 33 -